Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-208
Invasion of privacy; death of subject; effect.

The right of action for invasion of privacy created by sections 20-201 to 20-211 and 25-840.01, with the single exception of the action arising out of exploitation of a person's name or likeness in section 20-202, shall not be deemed to survive the death of the subject of any such invasion of privacy.

Laws 1979, LB 394, § 8.